Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Chapter 4. Line of Duty Act.

§ 9.1-400.
Title of chapter; definitions.

This chapter shall be known and designated as the Line of Duty Act.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Beneficiary” means the spouse of a deceased person and such persons as are entitled to take under the will of a deceased person if testate, or as his heirs at law if intestate.“Deceased person” means any individual whose death occurs on or after April 8, 1972, in the line of duty as the direct or proximate result of the performance of his duty, including the presumptions under §§

27-40.1

,

27-40.2

,

51.1-813

,

65.2-402

, and

65.2-402

.1 if his position is covered by the applicable statute, as a law-enforcement officer of the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions, except employees designated pursuant to §

53.1-1

0 to investigate allegations of criminal behavior affecting the operations of the Department of Corrections, employees designated pursuant to §

66-3

to investigate allegations of criminal behavior affecting the operations of the Department of Juvenile Justice, and members of the investigations unit of the State Inspector General designated pursuant to §

2.2-311

to investigate allegations of criminal behavior affecting the operations of a state or nonstate agency; a correctional officer as defined in §

53.1-1

; a jail officer; a regional jail or jail farm superintendent; a sheriff, deputy sheriff, or city sergeant or deputy city sergeant of the City of Richmond; a police chaplain; a member of any fire company or department or emergency medical services agency that has been recognized by an ordinance or a resolution of the governing body of any county, city, or town of the Commonwealth as an integral part of the official safety program of such county, city, or town, including a person with a recognized membership status with such fire company or department who is enrolled in a Fire Service Training course offered by the Virginia Department of Fire Programs or any fire company or department training required in pursuit of qualification to become a certified firefighter; a member of any fire company providing fire protection services for facilities of the Virginia National Guard or the Virginia Air National Guard; a member of the Virginia National Guard or the Virginia Defense Force while such member is serving in the Virginia National Guard or the Virginia Defense Force on official state duty or federal duty under Title 32 of the United States Code; any special agent of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority; any regular or special conservation police officer who receives compensation from a county, city, or town or from the Commonwealth appointed pursuant to the provisions of §

29.1-200

; any commissioned forest warden appointed under the provisions of § 10.1-1135; any member or employee of the Virginia Marine Resources Commission granted the power of arrest pursuant to §

28.2-900

; any Department of Emergency Management hazardous materials officer; any other employee of the Department of Emergency Management who is performing official duties of the agency, when those duties are related to a major disaster or emergency, as defined in § 44-146.16, that has been or is later declared to exist under the authority of the Governor in accordance with § 44-146.28; any employee of any county, city, or town performing official emergency management or emergency services duties in cooperation with the Department of Emergency Management, when those duties are related to a major disaster or emergency, as defined in § 44-146.16, that has been or is later declared to exist under the authority of the Governor in accordance with § 44-146.28 or a local emergency, as defined in § 44-146.16, declared by a local governing body; any nonfirefighter regional hazardous materials emergency response team member; any conservation officer of the Department of Conservation and Recreation commissioned pursuant to § 10.1-115; or any full-time sworn member of the enforcement division of the Department of Motor Vehicles appointed pursuant to §

46.2-217

.“Disabled person” means any individual who has been determined to be mentally or physically incapacitated so as to prevent the further performance of his duties at the time of his disability where such incapacity is likely to be permanent, and whose incapacity occurs in the line of duty as the direct or proximate result of the performance of his duty, including the presumptions under §§

27-40.1

,

27-40.2

,

51.1-813

, 65.2-402, and

65.2-402.1

if his position is covered by the applicable statute, in any position listed in the definition of deceased person in this section. “Disabled person” does not include any individual who has been determined to be no longer disabled pursuant to subdivision A 2 of §

9.1-404

. “Disabled person” includes any state employee included in the definition of a deceased person who was disabled on or after January 1, 1966.“Eligible dependent” for purposes of continued health insurance pursuant to §

9.1-401

means the natural or adopted child or children of a deceased person or disabled person or of a deceased or disabled person’s eligible spouse, provided that any such natural child is born as the result of a pregnancy that occurred prior to the time of the employee’s death or disability and that any such adopted child is (i) adopted prior to the time of the employee’s death or disability or (ii) adopted after the employee’s death or disability if the adoption is pursuant to a preadoptive agreement entered into prior to the death or disability. Notwithstanding the foregoing, “eligible dependent” shall also include the natural or adopted child or children of a deceased person or disabled person born as the result of a pregnancy or adoption that occurred after the time of the employee’s death or disability, but prior to July 1, 2017. Eligibility will continue until the end of the year in which the eligible dependent reaches age 26 or when the eligible dependent ceases to be eligible based on the Virginia Administrative Code or administrative guidance as determined by the Department of Human Resource Management.“Eligible spouse” for purposes of continued health insurance pursuant to §

9.1-401

means the spouse of a deceased person or a disabled person at the time of the death or disability. Eligibility will continue until the eligible spouse dies, ceases to be married to a disabled person, or in the case of the spouse of a deceased person, dies, remarries on or after July 1, 2017, or otherwise ceases to be eligible based on the Virginia Administrative Code or administrative guidance as determined by the Department of Human Resource Management.“Employee” means any person who would be covered or whose spouse, dependents, or beneficiaries would be covered under the benefits of this chapter if the person became a disabled person or a deceased person.“Employer” means (i) the employer of a person who is a covered employee or (ii) in the case of a volunteer who is a member of any fire company or department or rescue squad described in the definition of “deceased person,” the county, city, or town that by ordinance or resolution recognized such fire company or department or rescue squad as an integral part of the official safety program of such locality.“Fund” means the Line of Duty Death and Health Benefits Trust Fund established pursuant to §

9.1-400.1

.“Line of duty” means any action the deceased or disabled person was obligated or authorized to perform by rule, regulation, condition of employment or service, or law.“LODA Health Benefit Plans” means the separate health benefits plans established pursuant to §

9.1-401

.“Nonparticipating employer” means any employer that is a political subdivision of the Commonwealth that elected to directly fund the cost of benefits provided under this chapter and not participate in the Fund.“Participating employer” means any employer that is a state agency or is a political subdivision of the Commonwealth that did not make an election to become a nonparticipating employer.“VRS” means the Virginia Retirement System.

History.

1995, cc. 112, 156, 597, §§ 2.1-133.5, 2.1-133.6; 1996, cc. 66, 174; 1998, c. 712; 2001, cc. 678, 844; 2003, cc. 37, 41, 1005; 2004, c. 30; 2005, cc. 907, 910; 2006, c. 824; 2007, c. 87; 2011, cc. 572, 586; 2012, cc. 374, 458, 573; 2015, cc. 38, 502, 503, 730; 2016, c. 677; 2017, cc. 439, 627; 2018, c. 548; 2020, cc. 207, 559.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 678 amended former § 2.1-133.6, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2001, c. 678 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2001 amendment by c. 678, in the paragraph defining “Deceased person,” substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in two places, and inserted “a police chaplain in the City of Virginia Beach.”

Acts 2005, cc. 907 and 910, cl. 2 provides: “That any person eligible for benefits solely by virtue of the provisions of §

9.1-400

of this act shall be entitled to such benefits only on a prospective basis upon approval of a claim pursuant to §§

9.1-403

and

9.1-404

that is made on or after July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2006, c. 824, cl. 2, provides: “That any person eligible for benefits solely by virtue of the provisions of §

9.1-400

of this act shall be entitled to such benefits only on a prospective basis upon approval of a claim pursuant to §§

9.1-403

and

9.1-404

that is made on or after July 1, 2006.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 3 provides: “That any person who holds a position listed in the definition of ‘deceased person’ under §

9.1-400

of the Code of Virginia who is temporarily disabled in the direct line of duty as defined in §

9.1-400

of the Code of Virginia and who is required to have a state certification for purposes of maintaining his employment shall not have such certification lapse during such period of temporary disability, not to exceed two years. State agencies involved in such recertification, including but not limited to the Virginia Department of Emergency Management, the Department of Criminal Justice Services, the Virginia Department of Fire Programs, and the Virginia Department of Health, may develop and promulgate regulations to carry out the provisions of this act with input from persons holding the positions listed in the definition of ‘deceased person’ or organizations that represent them. Certifying state agencies may suspend a person’s certification when, but for the provisions of this act, it would otherwise lapse. Certifying state agencies shall provide a reasonable time frame for a person covered under the provisions of this act who wishes to return to work to become recertified.”

Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 4 provides: “That each nonparticipating employer shall pay its pro rata share of estimated implementation costs to the Virginia Retirement System and the Department of Human Resource Management in an amount and manner and on such date as may be determined by the Virginia Retirement System and the Department of Human Resource Management, respectively.”

Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017, except the provisions of the fourth enactment of this act, which shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 477 Q 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

9.1-400

, Code of Virginia, or any contrary provision of law, “eligible dependent” for purposes of continued health insurance pursuant to §

9.1-401

, Code of Virginia, shall also include the natural or adopted child or children of a ‘deceased person’, as defined in §

9.1-400

, Code of Virginia, or ‘disabled person’, as defined in § 9.1-400, Code of Virginia, born as the result of a pregnancy or adoption that occurred after the time of the employee’s death or disability and prior to July 1, 2017. Eligibility will continue until the end of the year in which the eligible dependent reaches age 26 or when the eligible dependent ceases to be eligible based on the Virginia Administrative Code or administrative guidance as determined by the Department of Human Resource Management.”

Effective date.

This section chapter became effective October 1, 2001.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 37 and 41 are identical, and deleted “in the City of Virginia Beach” following “chaplain” in the definition of “Deceased person.”

The 2003 amendment by c. 1005, in the definition of “Deceased person,” substituted the language beginning “any Department of Emergency Management hazardous materials officer” and ending “§ 44-146.16, as declared by a local governing body” for “any Department of Emergency Management hazardous materials officer.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 30 deleted “any agent, investigator, or inspector vested with the power to arrest pursuant to § 56-334” following “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Board” in the definition of “Deceased person.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 907 and 910 are identical, and added the last sentence of the paragraph defining “Disabled person.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 824 substituted “January 1, 1966” for “January 1, 1972” in the last sentence in the definition of “Disabled person” in subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” near the middle in the definition of “Deceased person.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 572 and 586 are identical, and twice deleted “State” preceding “Defense Force” in the definition for “Deceased person.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 374 and 573 are identical, and inserted “a member of any fire company providing fire protection services for facilities of the Virginia National Guard” preceding “a member of the Virginia National Guard” in the definition of “Deceased person” in subsection B.

The 2012 amendment by c. 458 added “or any full-time sworn member of the enforcement division of the Department of Motor Vehicles appointed pursuant to §

46.2-217

” to the end in the definition of “Deceased person” and made a related change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and substituted “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority” for “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Board” in the definition of “Deceased person.”

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503, are identical and substituted “emergency medical services agency” for “rescue squad” in the definition for “Deceased person” in subsection B.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 677, effective July 1, 2017, in both versions of the definition of “Deceased person,” inserted “in the line of duty” and “and

65.2-402.1

if his position is covered by the applicable statute”; rewrote the definition of “Disabled person,” which read: “ ‘Disabled person’ means any individual who, as the direct or proximate result of the performance of his duty in any position listed in the definition of deceased person in this section, has become mentally or physically incapacitated so as to prevent the further performance of duty where such incapacity is likely to be permanent. The term shall also include any state employee included in the definition of a deceased person who was disabled on or after January 1, 1966”; and added definitions for “Eligible dependent,” “Eligible spouse,” “Employee,” “Employer,” “Fund,” “LODA Health Benefits Plans,” “Nonparticipating employer,” “Participating employer,” and “VRS.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 439, in subsection B, in the definition for “Deceased person,” inserted “or the Virginia Air National Guard”; in the definition for “Disabled person,” deleted the former third sentence, which read “Disabled person also does not include any individual during any period in which his health insurance coverage in the LODA Health Benefits Plan is suspended pursuant to subdivision C 4 of §

9.1-401

”; rewrote the definition for “Eligible dependent”; in the definition for “Eligible spouse,” inserted “on or after July 1, 2017”; and deleted “on or before July 1, 2012” following “Commonwealth that elected” in the definition for “Nonparticipating employer.”

The 2017 amendment by c. 627, in the definition of “Deceased person,” inserted “including a person with a recognized membership status with such fire company or department who is enrolled in a Fire Service Training course offered by the Virginia Department of Fire Programs or any fire company or department training required in pursuit of qualification to become a certified firefighter.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 548 inserted “except employees designated pursuant to §

53.1-10

to investigate allegations of criminal behavior affecting the operations of the Department of Corrections, employees designated pursuant to §

66-3

to investigate allegations of criminal behavior affecting the operations of the Department of Juvenile Justice, and members of the investigations unit of the State Inspector General designated pursuant to §

2.2-311

to investigate allegations of criminal behavior affecting the operations of a state or nonstate agency” in the definition for “Deceased person” in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 207 and 559 are identical, and added the second sentence in the definition for “Eligible dependent.”

§ 9.1-400.1.
Line of Duty Death and Health Benefits Trust Fund.

There is hereby established a permanent and perpetual fund to be known as the Line of Duty Death and Health Benefits Trust Fund, consisting of such moneys as may be appropriated by the General Assembly, contributions or reimbursements from participating and nonparticipating employers, gifts, bequests, endowments, or grants from the United States government or its agencies or instrumentalities, net income from the investment of moneys held in the Fund, and any other available sources of funds, public and private. Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest and income earned from the investment of such moneys shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. The moneys in the Fund shall be (i) deemed separate and independent trust funds, (ii) segregated and accounted for separately from all other funds of the Commonwealth, and (iii) administered solely in the interests of the persons who are covered under the benefits provided pursuant to this chapter. Deposits to and assets of the Fund shall not be subject to the claims of creditors.

The Virginia Retirement System shall invest, reinvest, and manage the assets of the Fund as provided in §

51.1-124.39

and shall be reimbursed from the Fund for such activities as provided in that section.

The Fund shall be used to provide the benefits under this chapter related to disabled persons, deceased persons, eligible dependents, and eligible spouses on behalf of participating employers and to pay related administrative costs.

Each participating employer shall make annual contributions to the Fund and provide information as determined by VRS. The amount of the contribution for each participating employer shall be determined on a current disbursement basis in accordance with the provisions of this section. For purposes of establishing contribution amounts for participating employers, a member of any fire company or department or rescue squad that has been recognized by an ordinance or a resolution of the governing body of any locality of the Commonwealth as an integral part of the official safety program of such locality shall be considered part of the locality served by the company, department, or rescue squad. If a company, department, or rescue squad serves more than one locality, the affected localities shall determine the basis and apportionment of the required covered payroll and contributions for each company, department, or rescue squad.If any participating employer fails to remit contributions or other fees or costs associated with the Fund, VRS shall inform the State Comptroller and the affected participating employer of the delinquent amount. In calculating the delinquent amount, VRS may impose an interest rate of one percent per month of delinquency. The State Comptroller shall forthwith transfer such delinquent amount, plus interest, from any moneys otherwise distributable to such participating employer.

History.

2016, c. 677; 2017, c. 439.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017, except the provisions of the fourth enactment of this act, which shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 477 Q 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

9.1-400.1

D, Code of Virginia, the annual contribution for each participating employer shall be based on a premium of $717.31 per eligible full-time equivalent employee in the first year and $722.55 per eligible full-time equivalent employee in the second year.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 439, in subsection D, inserted the last two sentences in the first paragraph.

§ 9.1-401.
Continued health insurance coverage for disabled persons, eligible spouses, and eligible dependents.

Disabled persons, eligible spouses, and eligible dependents shall be afforded continued health insurance coverage as provided in this section, the cost of which shall be paid by the nonparticipating employer to the Department of Human Resource Management or from the Fund on behalf of a participating employer, as applicable. If any disabled person or eligible spouse is receiving the benefits described in this section and would otherwise qualify for the health insurance credit described in Chapter 14 (§

51.1-1400

et seq.) of Title 51.1, the amount of such credit shall be deposited into the Line of Duty Death and Health Benefits Trust Fund or paid to the nonparticipating employer, as applicable, from the health insurance credit trust fund, in a manner prescribed by VRS.

The continued health insurance coverage provided by this section for all disabled persons, eligible spouses, and eligible dependents shall be through separate plans, referred to as the LODA Health Benefits Plans (the Plans), administered by the Department of Human Resource Management. The Plans shall comply with all applicable federal and state laws and shall be modeled upon state employee health benefits program plans. Funding of the Plans’ reserves and contingency shall be provided through a line of credit, the amount of which shall be based on an actuarially determined estimate of liabilities. The Department of Human Resource Management shall be reimbursed for health insurance premiums and all reasonable costs incurred and associated, directly and indirectly, in performing the duties pursuant to this section (i) from the Line of Duty Death and Health Benefits Trust Fund for costs related to disabled persons, deceased persons, eligible dependents, and eligible spouses on behalf of participating employers and (ii) from a nonparticipating employer for premiums and costs related to disabled persons, deceased persons, eligible dependents, and eligible spouses for which the nonparticipating employer is responsible. If any nonparticipating employer fails to remit such premiums and costs, the Department of Human Resource Management shall inform the State Comptroller and the affected nonparticipating employer of the delinquent amount. In calculating the delinquent amount, the Department of Human Resource Management may impose an interest rate of one percent per month of delinquency. The State Comptroller shall forthwith transfer such delinquent amount, plus interest, from any moneys otherwise distributable to such nonparticipating employer.
B. 1. The continued health insurance coverage provided by this section for all disabled persons, eligible spouses, and eligible dependents shall be through separate plans, referred to as the LODA Health Benefits Plans (the Plans), administered by the Department of Human Resource Management. The Plans shall comply with all applicable federal and state laws and shall be modeled upon state employee health benefits program plans. Funding of the Plans’ reserves and contingency shall be provided through a line of credit, the amount of which shall be based on an actuarially determined estimate of liabilities. The Department of Human Resource Management shall be reimbursed for health insurance premiums and all reasonable costs incurred and associated, directly and indirectly, in performing the duties pursuant to this section (i) from the Line of Duty Death and Health Benefits Trust Fund for costs related to disabled persons, deceased persons, eligible dependents, and eligible spouses on behalf of participating employers and (ii) from a nonparticipating employer for premiums and costs related to disabled persons, deceased persons, eligible dependents, and eligible spouses for which the nonparticipating employer is responsible. If any nonparticipating employer fails to remit such premiums and costs, the Department of Human Resource Management shall inform the State Comptroller and the affected nonparticipating employer of the delinquent amount. In calculating the delinquent amount, the Department of Human Resource Management may impose an interest rate of one percent per month of delinquency. The State Comptroller shall forthwith transfer such delinquent amount, plus interest, from any moneys otherwise distributable to such nonparticipating employer.

In the event that temporary health care insurance coverage is needed for disabled persons, eligible spouses, and eligible dependents during the period of transition into the LODA Health Benefits Plans, the Department of Human Resource Management is authorized to acquire and provide temporary transitional health insurance coverage. The type and source of the transitional health plans shall be within the sole discretion of the Department of Human Resource Management. Transitional coverage for eligible dependents shall comply with the eligibility criteria of the transitional plans until enrollment in the LODA Health Benefits Plan can be completed.

Except as provided in subdivision 2 and any other law, continued health insurance coverage in any LODA Health Benefits Plans shall not be provided to any person (i) whose coverage under the Plan is based on a deceased person’s death or a disabled person’s disability occurring on or after July 1, 2017 and (ii) who is eligible for Medicare due to age.
C. 1. a. Except as provided in subdivision 2 and any other law, continued health insurance coverage in any LODA Health Benefits Plans shall not be provided to any person (i) whose coverage under the Plan is based on a deceased person’s death or a disabled person’s disability occurring on or after July 1, 2017 and (ii) who is eligible for Medicare due to age.

Coverage in the LODA Health Benefits Plans shall also cease for any person upon his death.

2.

The provisions of subdivision 1 a shall not apply to any disabled person who is eligible for Medicare due to disability under Social Security Disability Insurance or a Railroad Retirement Board Disability Annuity. The Department of Human Resource Management may provide such disabled person coverage under a LODA Health Benefits Plan that is separate from the plan for other persons.

3.

Continued health insurance under this section shall also terminate upon the disabled person’s return to full duty in any position listed in the definition of deceased person in §

9.1-400

. Such disabled person shall promptly notify the participating or nonparticipating employer, VRS, and the Department of Human Resource Management upon his return to work.

4.

Such continued health insurance shall be suspended for the Plan year following a calendar year in which the disabled person whose coverage under the Plan is based on a disability occurring on or after July 1, 2017, has earned income in an amount equal to or greater than the salary of the position held by the disabled person at the time of disability, indexed annually based upon the annual increases in the United States Average Consumer Price Index for all items, all urban consumers (CPI-U), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor. Such suspension shall cease the Plan year following a calendar year in which the disabled person has not earned such amount of income. The disabled person shall notify the participating or nonparticipating employer, VRS, and the Department of Human Resource Management no later than March 1 of the year following any year in which he earns income of such amount, and notify the participating or nonparticipating employer, VRS, and the Department of Human Resource Management when he no longer is earning such amount. Upon request, a disabled person shall provide VRS and the Department of Human Resource Management with documentation of earned income.

History.

1998, c. 712, § 2.1-133.7:1; 2000, c. 616; 2001, c. 844; 2016, c. 677; 2017, c. 439.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017, except the provisions of the fourth enactment of this act, which shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 477 Q 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

9.1-400

, Code of Virginia, or any contrary provision of law, ‘eligible dependent’ for purposes of continued health insurance pursuant to §

9.1-401

, Code of Virginia, shall also include the natural or adopted child or children of a ‘deceased person’, as defined in §

9.1-400

, Code of Virginia, or ‘disabled person’, as defined in § 9.1-400, Code of Virginia, born as the result of a pregnancy or adoption that occurred after the time of the employee’s death or disability and prior to July 1, 2017. Eligibility will continue until the end of the year in which the eligible dependent reaches age 26 or when the eligible dependent ceases to be eligible based on the Virginia Administrative Code or administrative guidance as determined by the Department of Human Resource Management.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 477 Q 4, as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of § 9.l-401(C), Code of Virginia, any disabled person, as defined in §

9.1-400

(B), Code of Virginia, who was injured in the line-of-duty in February 2016 but whose date of disability for purposes of the Line-of-Duty Act is in March 2019, shall not be subject to subdivision 4 of such subsection. Also, the spouse of such person as of the date of disability shall be considered an ‘eligible spouse’ for purposes of continued health coverage pursuant to §

9.1-401

, Code of Virginia, and will not be subject to the provisions of that definition that disqualify a spouse who ceases to be married to a disabled person, as defined in §

9.1-400

, Code of Virginia, or the spouse of a deceased person who remarries at any time.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 677, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 439, in subsection A, substituted “Disabled persons” for “Employees” in the first sentence, and inserted “or eligible spouse” in the second sentence; in subdivision B 2, substituted “disabled persons” for “employees” in the first sentence; in subdivision C 4, substituted “Plan year” for “year” twice, inserted “whose coverage under the Plan is based on a disability occurring on or after July 1, 2017,” in the first sentence, and substituted “March 1” for “January 15” in the third sentence.

§ 9.1-401.1.
Supplemental short-term disability benefit for state police officers.

A state police officer who is a participating employee, as defined in §

51.1-1100

, and who incurs a work-related injury in the line of duty, shall receive supplemental short-term disability coverage, pursuant to §

51.1-1121

, that provides income replacement for 100 percent of the officer’s creditable compensation for the first six months and, pursuant to a certification by the Superintendent of State Police, based on a medical evaluation, that the officer is likely to return to service within another six months, up to one calendar year, that the officer is disabled, without regard to the officer’s number of months of state service. Except as provided in this section with regard to the rate of income replacement and the duration of supplemental short-term disability coverage, such state police officers shall be eligible for work-related, supplemental short-term disability benefits upon the same terms and conditions that apply to other participating employees pursuant to Article 4 (§

51.1-1119

et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 51.1. Upon the expiration of the one-calendar-year period, such state police officers shall be eligible for supplemental long-term disability benefits as provided in §

51.1-1123

.

History.

2010, c. 654.

§ 9.1-402.
Payments to beneficiaries of certain deceased law-enforcement officers, firefighters, etc., and retirees.

The beneficiary of a deceased person whose death occurred on or before December 31, 2005, while in the line of duty as the direct or proximate result of the performance of his duty shall be entitled to receive the sum of $75,000, which shall be paid by the nonparticipating employer or from the Fund on behalf of a participating employer, as applicable, in gratitude for and in recognition of his sacrifice on behalf of the people of the Commonwealth.

The beneficiary of a deceased person whose death occurred on or after January 1, 2006, while in the line of duty as the direct or proximate result of the performance of his duty shall be entitled to receive the sum of $100,000, which shall be paid by the nonparticipating employer or from the Fund on behalf of a participating employer, as applicable, in gratitude for and in recognition of his sacrifice on behalf of the people of the Commonwealth.

Subject to the provisions of §

27-40.1

,

27-40.2

,

51.1-813

, or

65.2-402

, if the deceased person’s death (i) arose out of and in the course of his employment or (ii) was within five years from his date of retirement, his beneficiary shall be entitled to receive the sum of $25,000, which shall be paid by the nonparticipating employer or from the Fund on behalf of a participating employer, as applicable.

History.

1995, cc. 156, 597, § 2.1-133.7; 2000, c. 314; 2001, c. 844; 2006, c. 878; 2016, c. 677.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017, except the provisions of the fourth enactment of this act, which shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 878 inserted “on or before December 31, 2005” in subsection A; inserted subsection B; and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 677, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “paid by the nonparticipating employer or from the Fund on behalf of a participating employer, as applicable” for “payable out of the general fund of the state treasury” in subsections A through C; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 9.1-402.1.
Payments for burial expenses.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that expeditious payments for burial expenses be made for deceased persons whose death is determined to be a direct and proximate result of their performance in the line of duty as defined by the Line of Duty Act. Upon the approval of VRS, at the request of the family of a person who may be subject to the line of duty death benefits, payments shall be made to a funeral service provider for burial and transportation costs by the nonparticipating employer or from the Fund on behalf of a participating employer, as applicable. These payments would be advanced from the death benefit that would be due to the beneficiary of the deceased person if it is determined that the person qualifies for line of duty coverage. Expenses advanced under this provision shall not exceed the coverage amounts outlined in §

65.2-512

. In the event a determination is made that the death is not subject to the line of duty benefits, VRS or other Virginia governmental retirement fund of which the deceased is a member will deduct from benefit payments otherwise due to be paid to the beneficiaries of the deceased payments previously paid for burial and related transportation expenses and return such funds to the nonparticipating employer or to the Fund on behalf of a participating employer, as applicable. The Virginia Retirement System shall have the right to file a claim with the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission against any employer to recover burial and related transportation expenses advanced under this provision.

History.

2012, cc. 90, 576; 2016, c. 677.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 677, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017, except the provisions of the fourth enactment of this act, which shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 677, effective July 1, 2017, inserted “deceased” preceding “persons” in the first sentence; in the second sentence, substituted “Upon the approval of VRS” for “The State Comptroller is hereby authorized to release,” inserted “shall be made” and added “by the nonparticipating employer or from the Fund on behalf of a participating employer, as applicable” at the end; in the fourth sentence, substituted “VRS” for “the Virginia Retirement System,” inserted “Virginia governmental,” deleted “by the State Comptroller” preceding “for burial,” and substituted “nonparticipating employer or from the Fund on behalf of a participating employer, as applicable” for “State Comptroller”; substituted “Virginia Retirement System” for “State Comptroller” in the last sentence; and made a minor stylistic change.